Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3201
Act, how cited.

Sections 76-3201 to 76-3223 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Appraisal Management Company Registration Act.

Laws 2011, LB410, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB17, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB989, § 3.